Hawaii statutes.
§291E-44.5 Ignition interlock permits;
driving for employment. (a) Except as provided in subsection (b), upon
proof that the respondent has installed an ignition interlock device in any
vehicle the respondent operates and obtained motor vehicle insurance or
self-insurance that complies with the requirements of section 431:10C-104 or
431:10C-105, the director shall issue an ignition interlock permit that will
allow the respondent to drive a vehicle equipped with an ignition interlock
device during the revocation period.

(b) Except as provided in sections 286-118.5
and 291E-61.6, the director shall not issue an ignition interlock permit to:

(1) A respondent whose license is expired, suspended,
or revoked as a result of action other than the instant revocation;

(2) A respondent who does not hold a valid license at
the time of arrest for the violation of section 291E-61;

(3) A respondent who holds a license that is a
learner's permit or instruction permit; or

(4) A respondent who holds either a category 4
license under section 286-102(b) or a commercial driver's license under section
286-239(a) unless the ignition interlock permit is restricted to a category 1,
2, or 3 license under section 286-102(b).

(c) Except as provided in subsection (b), the
director may issue a separate permit authorizing a respondent to operate a
vehicle owned by the respondent's employer during the period of revocation
without installation of an ignition interlock device if the respondent is
gainfully employed in a position that requires driving and the respondent will
be discharged if prohibited from driving a vehicle not equipped with an
ignition interlock device.

(d) A request made pursuant to subsection (c)
shall be accompanied by:

(1) A sworn statement from the respondent containing
facts establishing that the respondent currently is employed in a position that
requires driving and that the respondent will be discharged if prohibited from
driving a vehicle not equipped with an ignition interlock device; and

(2) A sworn statement from the respondent's employer
establishing that the employer will, in fact, discharge the respondent if the
respondent is prohibited from driving a vehicle not equipped with an ignition
interlock device and identifying the specific vehicle or vehicles and hours of
the day the respondent will drive, not to exceed twelve hours per day, for
purposes of employment.

(e) A permit issued pursuant to subsection (c)
shall include restrictions allowing the respondent to drive:

(1) Only during specified hours of employment, not to
exceed twelve hours per day, and only for activities solely within the scope of
the employment;

(2) Only the vehicles specified; and

(3) Only if the permit is kept in the respondent's
possession while operating the employer's vehicle.

In addition, the director may impose other
appropriate restrictions. [L 2008, c 171, §3; am L 2009, c 88, §13; am L 2010,
c 166, §16; am L 2012, c 327, §18; am L 2014, c 72, §6]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next